Hawaii statutes.
§329-16 Schedule II. (a) The
controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule II.

(b) Any of the following substances, except
those narcotic drugs listed in other schedules, whether produced directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently
by means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical
synthesis:

(1) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound,
derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, including the following:

(A) Raw opium;

(B) Opium extracts;

(C) Opium fluid;

(D) Powdered opium;

(E) Granulated opium;

(F) Codeine;

(G) Ethylmorphine;

(H) Etorphine hydrochloride;

(I) Hydrocodone;

(J) Hydromorphone;

(K) Metopon;

(L) Morphine;

(M) Oxycodone;

(N) Oxymorphone;

(O) Thebaine;

(P) Dihydroetorphine;

(Q) Oripavine; and

(R) Tincture of opium;

(2) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or
preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the
substances referred to in paragraph (1), but not including the isoquinoline
alkaloids of opium;

(3) Opium poppy and poppy straw;

(4) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative,
or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of
these substances, but not including decocanized coca leaves or extractions
which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine; cocaine or any salt or isomer
thereof; and

(5) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of
poppy straw in either liquid, solid, or powder form that contains the
phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy).

(c) Any of the following opiates, including
their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever the
existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the
specific chemical designation:

(1) Alfentanil;

(2) Alphaprodine;

(3) Anileridine;

(4) Bezitramide;

(5) Bulk Dextropropoxyphene (nondosage form);

(6) Carfentanil;

(7) Dihydrocodeine;

(8) Diphenoxylate;

(9) Fentanyl;

(10) Isomethadone;

(11) Levo-alphacetylmethadol (LAAM);

(12) Levomethorphan;

(13) Levorphanol;

(14) Metazocine;

(15) Methadone;

(16) Methadone-Intermediate,
4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane;

(17) Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1,
1-diphenyl-propane-carboxylic acid;

(18) Pethidine (Meperidine);

(19) Pethidine-Intermediate-A,
4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;

(20) Pethidine-Intermediate-B,
ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;

(21) Pethidine-Intermediate-C,
1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;

(22) Phenazocine;

(23) Piminodine;

(24) Racemethorphan;

(25) Racemorphan;

(26) Remifentanil;

(27) Sufentanil; and

(28) Tapentadol.

(d) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted
or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a
depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless
specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers,
and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Amobarbital;

(2) Glutethimide;

(3) Pentobarbital;

(4) Phencyclidine;

(5) Secobarbital.

(e)
Stimulants. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of the following substances having a danger or probable danger
associated with a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:

(1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and
salts of its optical isomers;

(2) Any substance which contains any quantity of
methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;

(3) Phenmetrazine and its salts;

(4) Methylphenidate; and

(5) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts
of its isomers.

(f) Immediate precursor. Unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances:

(1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and
methamphetamine:

(A) Phenylacetone, phenyl-2-propanone(P2P),
benzyl methyl ketone, methyl benzyl ketone;

(2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):

(A) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine; and

(B) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile(PCC);
or

(3) Immediate precursor to Fentanyl:

(A) 4‑anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine
(ANPP).

(g) Hallucinogenic substances, unless listed
in another schedule, shall include:

(1) Nabilone. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1 and am c 114,
§2(2); am L 1974, c 217, §2; am L 1975, c 26, §1; am L 1978, c 68, §3; am L
1979, c 194, §2; am L 1981, c 125, §§1, 2; am L 1984, c 166, §2; am L 1985, c
150, §2; am L 1987, c 203, §1; am L 1988, c 59, §2; am L 1990, c 138, §4; am L
1991, c 159, §7; am L 1995, c 122, §2; am L 1997, c 356, §2; am L 2000, c 98,
§§2, 3; am L 2001, c 203, §3; am L 2002, c 165, §1; am L 2003, c 151, §3; am L
2008, c 119, §4; am L 2009, c 117, §§1, 2; am L 2010, c 123, §2; am L 2011, c
73, §2; am L 2012, c 29, §2; am L 2013, c 48, §2]

Case Notes

Method used to prove that capsules of methaqualone
hydrochloride contained methaqualone accepted as evidence. 1 H. App. 31, 613
P.2d 919.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next